Utah statutes.
62A-2-103.   Office of Licensing -- Appointment -- Qualifications of director.

(1)  There is created the Office of Licensing within the Department of Human Services.  The office shall be the licensing authority for the department, and is vested with all the powers, duties, and responsibilities described in this chapter.

(2)  The executive director shall appoint the director of the office.

(3)  The director shall have a bachelor's degree from an accredited university or college, be experienced in administration, and be knowledgeable of human services licensing.

